Utah statutes.
63G-8-102.   Definitions.

As used in this act:

(1)  "Compensation" means payment for services in any form whatsoever, whether per diem or otherwise, except where the payment is solely for the purpose of paying subsistence, travel, or other expenses incurred by the person performing those services.

(2)  "Public entity" means the state or any political subdivision of it, or any office, department, division, board, agency, commission, council, authority, institution, hospital, school, college, university, or other instrumentality of the state or any political subdivision.

(3)  "Volunteer facilitator" is as defined in Section 67-20-2.



Amended by Chapter 249, 2013 General Session

